Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2304.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1510 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.* * *(b.1) Identification card renewal fee exemption.--Upon the issuance of an identification card under subsection (b) to a person that is 65 years of age or older who has surrendered their driver's license due to a physical or mental condition, as diagnosed by a health care provider, the department shall exempt the person from any fees required for the renewal of the identification card. The department may require evidence of the person's diagnosis from a health care provider.1234567891011121314151617 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2304PN3027 - 2 - 12